Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.120

Written admission as proof of service.

The written admission of the defendant, his or her agent or attorney, indorsed upon any summons, complaint and notice, or other paper, shall be complete proof of service in any case.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3009; Code 1881 s 1722; 1873 p 338 s 29; RRS s 1768.]